Connecticut, session 2026, HB05236.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) There is established
a Public Transit Workplace Health, Safety and Violence Prevention
Committee, which shall be in the Department of Transportation for
administrative purposes only. The committee shall consist of (A) two
public transit bus operators from each transit district formed under
chapter 103a of the general statutes appointed pursuant to subdivision
(2) of this subsection, and (B) two representatives of management from
each transit district appointed by the board of directors of such transit
district. The Commissioner of Transportation, or the commissioner's
designee, shall be an ex-officio, nonvoting member of the committee.
(2) If public transit bus operators employed by a transit district are
members of a collective bargaining unit, the employee organization
designated as the exclusive bargaining representative for such unit shall
appoint the two public transit bus operators to such committee. If public
transit bus operators are not members of a collective bargaining unit,
LCO No. 1401 1 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5236
the public transit bus operators appointed to such committee shall be
selected through a process determined by the public transit bus
operators employed in such transit district.
(3) All initial appointments to the committee shall be made not later
than November 1, 2026, and shall terminate on October 31, 2028,
regardless of when the initial appointment was made. Any member of
the committee may serve more than one term.
(4) The committee shall have two cochairpersons, one of whom shall
be a public transit bus operator elected by the members of the committee
who are public transit bus operators, and one of whom shall be elected
by members of the committee who are representatives of management
from transit districts.
(b) The Commissioner of Transportation, or the commissioner's
designee, shall select two acting cochairpersons of the committee from
its members for the purpose of organizing the first committee meeting,
one of whom shall be a public transit bus operator and one of whom
shall be a representative of the management of a transit district. Such
acting cochairpersons shall schedule and convene the first meeting,
which shall be held not later than December 1, 2026. During the first
meeting of the committee, (1) the members of the committee who are
public transit bus operators shall appoint, by majority vote, a permanent
cochairperson who is a public transit bus operator, and (2) the members
of the committee who represent the management of a transit district
shall appoint, by majority vote, a permanent cochairperson who
represents the management of a transit district.
(c) Appointed members of the committee shall serve for two-year
terms which shall commence on the date of appointment, except as
provided in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section. Members
shall continue to serve until their successors are appointed.
(d) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any
vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the
LCO No. 1401 2 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5236
balance of the unexpired term.
(e) The Department of Transportation shall assist the committee in
carrying out the committee's duties by posting on the department's
Internet web site records related to the committee's responsibilities,
including, but not limited to, the committee's meeting schedule, agenda,
minutes, plans and reports.
(f) The committee shall meet in person at least once a month and at
such other times as the cochairpersons deem necessary. A majority of
the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business. Decisions of the committee shall be made
by majority vote of the members present at any meeting.
(g) The committee shall have the following powers and duties: (1)
Adopt, review and revise as necessary a workplace health, safety and
violence protection plan pursuant to subsections (h) and (i) of this
section; (2) obtain from any executive department, board, commission
or other agency of the state such assistance and data as necessary and
available to carry out the purposes of this section; (3) accept any gift,
donation or bequest for the purpose of performing the duties described
in this section; and (4) perform such other acts as may be necessary and
appropriate to carry out the duties described in this section.
(h) Not later than January 1, 2028, the committee shall adopt an initial
workplace health, safety and violence protection plan that establishes
comprehensive and uniform protocols and procedures to address
workplace issues in transit districts. Such plan shall include: (1)
Procedures regarding the safe pick-up and discharge of passengers,
including passengers who require assistance, (2) protections for the
physical and mental health of public transit employees while
performing their duties, including the provision of reasonable breaks
throughout a shift and access to designated restrooms for public transit
bus operators, (3) risk reduction efforts to decrease the number and rates
of accidents, injuries and workplace violence, including assault of a
LCO No. 1401 3 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5236
person who is a public transit employee, as provided in section 53a-167c
of the general statutes, (4) guidance to public transit employees
concerning how to report (A) incidents of workplace violence within
each transit district and to appropriate law enforcement agencies, and
(B) unsafe working conditions within each transit district, (5)
procedures for the reporting and collecting of data detailing accidents,
injuries and workplace violence for the purpose of establishing risk
reduction targets and monitoring progress to improve workplace health
and safety and reduce workplace violence, (6) the development of, and
schedule regarding, appropriate training programs, including safety
operations and de-escalation strategies, to be completed by all public
transit employees and management, and (7) any other issue the
committee deems appropriate. No provision in such plan shall conflict
with any state or federal law regarding the safe operation of public
transit buses, including motor vehicle and traffic laws, reporting of
crimes or requirements for public transit bus operators to maintain a
commercial driver's license pursuant to section 14-44 of the general
statutes.
(i) Not later than January 1, 2029, and at least annually thereafter, the
committee shall review such plan and may revise such plan as the
committee deems appropriate.
(j) In the event the committee fails to adopt a plan in accordance with
100 the provisions of this section, the cochairpersons of the committee shall
101 submit the dispute to the Board of Mediation and Arbitration in
102 accordance with the procedure set forth in section 31-97 of the general
103 statutes and shall incorporate the decision rendered under the
104 provisions of section 31-98 of the general statutes into the plan.
105 (k) Any collective bargaining agreement between a transit district
106 and an employee organization entered into or modified after the date a
107 plan is adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall
108 incorporate such plan by reference.
LCO No. 1401 4 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5236
109 (l) The committee shall (1) submit each plan adopted pursuant to this
110 section to the members of the committee, employee organizations that
111 are the exclusive representative public transit employees, the board of
112 directors of each transit district, the Department of Transportation and
113 the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
114 cognizance of matters relating to transportation, and (2) have each such
115 plan published in a conspicuous place on the Department of
116 Transportation's Internet web site.
117 (m) No transit district may take or threaten to take any retaliatory
118 action against an employee of such transit district who notifies a law
119 enforcement agency or the management of such transit district to report
120 incidents of workplace violence or violations of the workplace health,
121 safety and violence protection plan adopted pursuant to this section.
122 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 4-9a of the general statutes is repealed
123 and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
124 (a) The Governor shall appoint the chairperson and executive
125 director, if any, of all boards and commissions within the Executive
126 Department, except the State Properties Review Board, the State
127 Elections Enforcement Commission, the Commission on Human Rights
128 and Opportunities, the Commission on Fire Prevention and Control, the
129 Citizen's Ethics Advisory Board, [and] the Transportation Policy
130 Advisory Council and the Public Transit Workplace Health, Safety and
131 Violence Prevention Committee.
132 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
133 "security barrier" means a protective partition made of hard, durable
134 and bulletproof materials designed to shield a public transit bus
135 operator from physical assault or projectiles while maintaining visibility
136 and communication with passengers that (1) extends from the bus floor
137 to the bus ceiling, (2) is capable of fully enclosing the public transit bus
138 operator's workstation and fully preventing the unwanted entry of
139 persons, limbs, fluids and objects into such workstation, and (3) does
LCO No. 1401 5 of 7

Raised Bill No. 5236
140 not impede the public transit bus operator's lines of sight from such
141 workstation to the exterior of the bus.
142 (b) On and after October 1, 2027, each public transit bus operated by
143 the Department of Transportation or a transit district formed under
144 chapter 103a of the general statutes shall be equipped with a security
145 barrier.
146 (c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of
147 Transportation and each transit district formed under chapter 103a of
148 the general statutes, in consultation with the labor organizations that
149 represent public transit bus operators employed by such transit
150 districts, shall (1) collaborate regarding (A) the use of security barriers
151 on public transit buses, including design, materials, specifications,
152 procurement and installation, (B) the use of panic buttons or other
153 technology designed to mitigate safety risks to public transit bus
154 operators, and (C) the development and installation of prominent
155 signage on board all public transit buses that inform the public of the
156 penalties for crimes against public transit bus operators, and (2) develop
157 a plan and timeline for the installation of security barriers on public
158 transit buses in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this
159 section. Not later than January 15, 2027, the commissioner shall submit
160 such plan and timeline to the joint standing committee of the General
161 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to transportation, in
162 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 4-9a(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section